Florida, session 2026, SB1252.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 1008.251, Florida Statutes, is created 19 to read: 20 1008.251âThe First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot 21 Program.âBeginning with the 2026-2027 school year, the First 22 Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot Program is created for a 23 period of 3 school years. The purpose of the program is to 24 assist school districts in providing a summer reading immersion 25 program for students who completed grade 1 and are at risk of 26 having a reading deficiency or exhibit a substantial deficiency 27 in reading. For purposes of the pilot program, a student is 28 deemed to be at risk of having a reading deficiency if he or she 29 scored a Level 1 on the midyear or the third administration of 30 the coordinated screening and progress monitoring under s. 31 1008.25. 32 (1)âThe Department of Education shall: 33 (a)âSelect two school districts to participate in the pilot 34 program. 35 (b)âCreate a First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot 36 Program for school districts to implement each year of the pilot 37 program. The program must: 38 1.âBe a minimum of 6 weeks in length. 39 2.âFocus on: 40 a.âFoundational grade 1 reading skills. 41 b.âPhonemic awareness, phonics, fluency, vocabulary, and 42 reading comprehension. 43 3.âAssess student learning gains and reading skills at the 44 conclusion of the program using the first grade final 45 administration of the coordinated screening and progress 46 monitoring or a state-approved diagnostic assessment. 47 (c)âEstablish reporting requirements for participating 48 school districts. 49 (2)âEach participating school district shall: 50 (a)âInvite students who have completed grade 1 who are at 51 risk of having a reading deficiency or exhibit a substantial 52 deficiency in reading to attend the First Grade Summer Reading 53 Immersion Pilot Program. 54 (b)âAdminister the First Grade Summer Reading Immersion 55 Pilot Program pursuant to department requirements and guidance. 56 (c)âProvide the data and information requested by the 57 department. 58 (d)âProvide periodic updates to the department on the 59 implementation of the First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot 60 Program. 61 (e)âUpon completion of each First Grade Summer Reading 62 Immersion Pilot Program, provide a report on student learning 63 gains and reading skills at the conclusion of the program, 64 including participation rates. 65 (3)âUpon the completion of the pilot program, the 66 department shall provide a report to the Legislature. The report 67 must include all of the following: 68 (a)âStudent outcomes for students who participated in the 69 First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot Program. 70 (b)âRates of student participation in the First Grade 71 Summer Reading Immersion Pilot Program. 72 (c)âPolicy recommendations for further implementation of 73 the First Grade Summer Reading Immersion Pilot Program. 74 (4)âThis section shall expire upon the submission of the 75 departmentâs report to the Legislature pursuant to subsection 76 (3). 77 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.